California statutes. Water Code
The planning for public recreation use and fish and wildlife preservation and enhancement in connection with state water projects shall be a part of the general project formulation activities of the Department of Water Resources, in consultation and co-operation with the departments and agencies specified in Section 11910, through the advance planning stage, including, but not limited to, the development of data on benefits and costs, recreation land use planning, and the acquisition of land. In planning and constructing any project, the department shall, to the extent possible, acquire all lands and locate and construct, or cause to be constructed, the project and all works and features incidental to its construction in such a manner as to permit the use thereof for the preservation and enhancement of fish and wildlife and for recreational purposes upon completion of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 867.)
-------------------------------------------

11912.

The department, in fixing and establishing prices, rates, and charges for water and power, shall include as a reimbursable cost of any state water project an amount sufficient to repay all costs incurred by the department, directly or by contract with other agencies, for the preservation of fish and wildlife and determined to be allocable to the costs of the project works constructed for the development of that water and power, or either. Costs incurred for the enhancement of fish and wildlife or for the development of public recreation shall not be included in the prices, rates, and charges for water and power, and shall be nonreimbursable costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 227.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11913.

(a) The Legislature hereby declares its intent that, except as funds are provided pursuant to Section 11915, there shall be included in the budget for the department for each fiscal year, and in the Budget Act for each fiscal year, an appropriation from the General Fund of the funds necessary for enhancement of fish and wildlife and for recreation in connection with state water projects as provided in this chapter.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the obligation of the State Water Resources Development System to reimburse the California Water Fund pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 12937 shall be reduced by the total of unreimbursed department costs incurred in the 1988–89 fiscal year and each succeeding fiscal year for enhancement of fish and wildlife and for recreation pursuant to this chapter. The reduction shall be contingent upon annual approval by the Legislature, in the Budget Act or other act, of the department’s allocation of those costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 716, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11913.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate funds sufficient to cover the costs incurred by the department for recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement specified pursuant to Section 11912, subject to legislative review and approval.

(b) The Davis-Dolwig Account is hereby created in the California Water Resources Development Bond Fund, created pursuant to Section 12935.

(c) On July 1, 2012, and every July 1 thereafter, the Controller shall transfer seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000) from the General Fund portion of the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund, created pursuant to Section 85 of the Harbors
 and Navigation Code, to the Davis-Dolwig Account. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, for the purposes of this chapter, seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000) is continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, from the Davis-Dolwig Account to the department for the costs of State Water Resources Development System, as described in Section 12931, facility operations, maintenance, and capital costs attributable to recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement as provided for in Section 11914. This subdivision shall be eligible for future adjustment by the Legislature in accordance with an appropriate water and power utility cost index, submitted by the department and approved by the Legislature by statute, that reflects changes in costs incurred or likely to be incurred by the department for operation, maintenance and capital costs of the State Water Resources Development System.

(d) (1) On July 1, 2012, and every July 1 thereafter, the Controller shall transfer two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) from the General Fund portion of the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund to the Davis-Dolwig Account. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) is continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, from the Davis-Dolwig Account to the department for the payment of State Water Resources Development System recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement costs incurred pursuant to this chapter on or before December 31, 2011.

(2) This subdivision shall be inoperative when the Director of Finance certifies that all costs described in paragraph (1) have been paid.

(e) The department shall provide details of the balance and expenditures of the Davis-Dolwig Account as
 part of the annual Governor’s budget process.

(f) Any cost for recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement incurred in connection with the State Water Resources Development System that exceeds the funding provided pursuant to subdivision (c) may be provided upon further appropriation by the Legislature, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 75050 of the Public Resources Code.

(g) The funds made available to the department pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (f) shall fulfill the legislative intent of this chapter to provide funds for fish and wildlife enhancements and recreation.

(h) Any obligation incurred on or after July 1, 2012, for recreation and fish and wildlife enhancements separate from available funding in the Davis-Dolwig Account and any additional funding that may be appropriated by the Legislature for
 this purpose shall be reimbursed by the state only if approved by the Legislature by statute.

(i) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use funds in the Davis-Dolwing Account for cashflow loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code.

(j) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), any amount in the Davis-Dolwig Account in excess of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) on June 30 of each year shall be transferred to the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 116.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11914.

The department shall make any necessary revisions in the allocation of costs of any state water project works constructed for the development of water and power, or either, which would result from the expenditure of funds under this chapter for enhancement of fish and wildlife and recreation in connection with such works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 867.)
-------------------------------------------

11915.

All moneys deposited in the Central Valley Water Project Construction Fund pursuant to the provisions of Section 12.1 of Chapter 138, Statutes of 1964, First Extraordinary Session and subdivision (c) of Section 6217 of the Public Resources Code, and all accruals to such moneys so deposited, are hereby appropriated to the department for expenditure by the department without regard to fiscal years for the purposes of the construction fund, in amounts equal to allocations to recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement and to the costs of acquiring rights-of-way, easements and property for recreation development which have become effective pursuant to Section 11912.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 981.)
-------------------------------------------

11915.1.

The provisions of this chapter shall not limit the department in the financing and construction of any of the facilities of the State Water Resources Development System pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 12930) of Part 6, nor shall they constitute a limitation on or modification of the responsibility of the department to make allocations of costs provided for in water supply contracts executed pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

11915.5.

For the purpose of furthering recreation in any project of the department, the department may exchange any real property it has acquired for property in the state owned by the United States which is of substantially equal value, whether or not such real property of the United States is adjacent to or needed for any project of the department. Such title or rights as the department deems necessary for the proper operation and maintenance of the water conservation, flood control or power features of any water project shall not be included in any exchange consummated under this section.

Any such exchange involving real property acquired by the department solely for recreation shall be concurred in by the Department of Parks and Recreation. Any such exchange involving property acquired by the department solely for fish and wildlife purposes shall be concurred in by the Department of Fish and Game. Any such exchange involving property acquired solely for fish, wildlife and recreational purposes shall be concurred in by the Department of Fish and Game and the Department of Parks and Recreation. Real property of the United States not necessary for a project of the department shall be acquired by the department by exchange under this section only if another agency of state government has agreed to acquire such real property from the department for the actual cost to the department of the real property which is to be given in exchange therefor; provided, that any amount appropriated to the department to reimburse it for prior expenditures for acquisition of such land shall be deducted from the actual cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1050.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Powers and Duties of the Department of Fish and Game and the Department of Natural Resources [11917. - 11920.]

11917.

The Department of Fish and Game shall manage fish and wildlife resources at state water projects, including any such additional resources as are created by such projects, in a manner compatible with the other uses of such projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 867.)
-------------------------------------------

11918.

The Department of Parks and Recreation is authorized to design, construct, operate, and maintain public recreation facilities at state water projects, with the exception of the planning, design, and construction of boating facilities, which shall be the responsibility of the Department of Navigation and Ocean Development pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 50 of the Harbors and Navigation Code. Before commencing the construction of any such facilities, the Department of Parks and Recreation shall submit its plans and designs to the local governmental agencies having jurisdiction over the area involved. The Department of Parks and Recreation shall make every effort to fulfill its responsibilities under this section by entering into contracts with the United States, local public agencies, or other entities, to the end that maximum development of the recreational potential of state water projects shall be realized. The Department of Parks and Recreation shall have the authority to establish and enforce standards for the development, operation, and maintenance of such public recreation areas.

The design, construction, operation, and maintenance of public recreation facilities at state water projects, and the management of project lands and water surfaces for recreational use, shall be subject to the approval of the Department of Water Resources to ensure that they shall not defeat or impair the orderly operation of any state water project for its other authorized purposes and the accomplishment of such purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1544.)
-------------------------------------------

11919.

Public recreation facilities in connection with state water projects are recreational areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 867.)
-------------------------------------------

11920.

The Wildlife Conservation Board is authorized to design and construct public fishing access sites to aqueducts constructed as part of state water projects in accordance with such policies and procedures as may be established by the board.

To the extent practicable such fishing access sites shall be constructed upon lands acquired for state water project purposes; provided, that such additional lands as may be necessary for such fishing access sites shall be acquired by the Department of Water Resources pursuant to this chapter; and, provided further, that such facilities as may be necessary to assure the safe use of such fishing access sites by the public shall be constructed by the Department of Water Resources upon the appropriation of funds for such purposes by the Legislature.

Plans for such fishing access sites shall be subject to the approval of the Department of Water Resources to ensure that they shall not defeat or impair the orderly operation of any state water project for its other authorized purposes and the accomplishment of such purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 411.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Short Title [11925. - 11925.]

11925.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Davis-Dolwig Act. ”

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 867.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Water Conservation and Reclamation Projects [11950. - 11985.]



  ARTICLE 1. Policy [11950. - 11954.]

11950.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Water Conservation Projects Act of 1985.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11951.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Agriculture is this state’s largest income producer, contributing approximately $14 billion annually to the economy of the state. California agriculture remains the leader in the development of modern agricultural technology and is supported by the world’s leading agricultural education and research institutions. However, the future growth and prosperity of agriculture is threatened by a lack of necessary irrigation water.

(b) The population of California is expected to increase by over three million persons by the year 2000. This increase alone will require at least an additional 600,000 acre-feet of water annually for municipal purposes.

(c) Upon commencement of the operation of the Central Arizona Project which is scheduled to occur by 1985, over 662,000 acre-feet of water presently available for use each year in California will be lost to the State of Arizona pursuant to decisions of the United States Supreme Court. These court decisions decrease the total water supply available to California from the Colorado River by a quantity sufficient to supply the needs of three and one-half million people.

(d) The central San Joaquin Valley faces a critical water shortage amounting to approximately 1.4 million acre-feet annually which is presently being mined from the groundwater basin. The lowering of the groundwater table is causing irrigation water to be pumped at excessive depths of 500 to 600 feet or more, which requires a tremendous use of energy at a high cost.

(e) Based on a 50 year average, California faces a drought in one out of every four years. During periods such as the 1976–1977 drought, the state has had critical water shortages, requiring emergency conservation measures and resulting in thousands of acres of prime agricultural land in the San Joaquin Valley remaining unplanted. At the peak of the 1976–77 drought period, the state lost approximately $1.5 billion in crop revenues as a result of inadequate supplies of irrigation water.

(f) A portion of the foregoing water requirements may be economically met by water conservation and reclamation projects which produce substantial quantities of additional usable water for use in areas of the state with inadequate local supplies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11952.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to encourage local agencies and private enterprise to implement potential water conservation and reclamation projects by establishing a state program to finance or assist in financing projects which meet state criteria and will result in additional supplies of water for use in areas of need. Water conservation and reclamation projects, including facilities for municipal and industrial advanced waste water treatment, regulatory impoundments, improvements to water supply and delivery systems, tailwater recovery systems, and sprinkler or drip irrigation systems, may result in increased quantities of usable water for beneficial purposes, but may be financially unattractive at the local level if the cost of additional fresh water is less than the cost to conserve or reclaim water.

(b) It is in the interests of both the users of water supplied by the state and the users of local water supplies to undertake water conservation and reclamation projects which supply water for purposes of the State Water Resources Development System at a cost less than the cost of new state water development facilities, and which provide benefits to local water users, including decreased salt concentrations, resulting from increased irrigation efficiency and reduced problems of pollution from waste water discharges. It is not the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to affect or otherwise defer the construction of water facilities necessary to meet the requirements of the people of this state, and nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect the authority of the department under any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11953.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to alter or impair any provision of law providing protections for areas of origin, including, but not limited to, Article 1.7 (commencing with Section 1215) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2, Section 10505, Article 3 (commencing with Section 11460) of Chapter 3, or Part 4.5 (commencing with Section 12200).

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11954.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to alter or impair any existing rights, including rights to divert water from the Colorado River and rights to the distribution or use of that water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Statewide Water Conservation [11960. - 11965.]

11960.

Any water supplier or user of water in the state that has an existing right which permits the supplier or user to sell water may enter into a contract under this chapter to finance the conservation or recycling of water and to sell the conserved or recycled water to another water supplier or water user.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11961.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, where any person or public agency undertakes any water conservation effort, either separately or jointly, pursuant to any contract with any other water user, which results in a reduced use of water by that person or agency, no forfeiture, dimunition, or impairment of the right to use the water conserved shall occur, except as set forth in the agreements between the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11962.

Water conservation and reclamation projects eligible for assistance under this chapter include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Projects for municipal and industrial advanced waste water treatment to permit the reuse of the water for additional purposes.

(b) Projects for the improvement of water supply and delivery facilities.

(c) Projects for the improvement of on-farm irrigation systems, including tailwater recovery systems, regulatory impoundments, and sprinkler, drip, or other irrigation systems which enable more efficient use of water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11963.

Any contract entered into pursuant to this chapter for the transfer or sale of conserved or recycled water may provide for the recall of water and may include terms for that recall. Any recall provisions shall include a notice period of not less than five years unless otherwise agreed by the parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11964.

Water conservation or reclamation projects developed pursuant to this chapter may be funded pursuant to any bond law heretofore or hereafter approved by the voters if the project is otherwise eligible for funding under the bond law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11965.

This article shall not be applicable to the State Water Resources Development System.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Conservation in the State Water Resources Development System [11970. - 11976.]

11970.

The department may use Central Valley Project revenue bonds or other funds available for the purposes of the State Water Resources Development System to finance, in whole or in part, water conservation programs and facilities that reduce demands by the sponsoring contractor for project water from the system for a period of time agreed to by the sponsoring contractor, and thereby increase the supply of project water available in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta for distribution to other contractors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11971.

As used in this article, “sponsoring contractor” means a contractor or contractors, who have a long-term water supply contract with the department and who agree to reduce demands for project water from the State Water Resources Development System in accordance with Section 11970.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11972.

A local water conservation project described in Section 11970 is eligible for funding pursuant to this article if, in the determination of the department, the project meets all of the following criteria:

(a) The project is engineeringly feasible and is capable of producing project water which is economically competitive with alternative new water supply sources.

(b) The construction and operation of the facilities and programs will not interfere with the requested deliveries of annual entitlement water to any contractor other than the sponsoring contractor.

(c) The project will not result in any greater annual charges to any contractor, other than the sponsoring contractor, than would have occurred with the construction at the same time of alternative new water supply sources constituting either reservoirs located north of the delta or off-aqueduct storage reservoirs located south or west of the delta designed to deliver water to the California Aqueduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11973.

The department shall determine whether a local water conservation project described in Section 11970 is economically competitive by comparing, in an engineering and economic analysis, the local conservation project with alternative new water supply sources constituting either reservoirs located north of the delta or off-aqueduct storage reservoirs located south or west of the delta designed to supply water to the California Aqueduct. The analysis for the alternative new water supply sources shall use the average cost per acre-foot of yield in the latest studies made for those sources by the department and shall compare those facilties with the proposed local conservation project using commonly accepted engineering economics. In the case of a local conservation project to be funded in part by the department as part of the system and in part from other sources, the economic analysis shall be applied only to the portion to be funded by the department as a part of the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11974.

A local water conservation project described in Section 11970 shall not be constructed or implemented pursuant to this article until both of the following occurs:

(a) The sponsoring contractor signs a written agreement with the department which indicates all of the following:

(1) The approval of the facility or program by the sponsoring contractor.

(2) The yield and the period of time during which the water from the local conservation project constitutes project water.

(3) The disposition of the local conservation project or of the yield from the local conservation project upon the expiration of that period of time.

(b) All contractors within whose boundaries any portion of the local water conservation project is located, and who are not sponsoring contractors for the local conservation project, approve the local water conservation project in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11975.

In the event of a shortage in water supply, within the meaning of Article 18(a) of the standard water supply contract between the department and the state water supply contractors, the determination of whether to count, in whole or in part, the reduced demand from future conservation programs described in Section 11970 in the allocation of deficiencies among contractors shall be based on a project-by-project evaluation taking into consideration such factors as any limitation on the use of the water from the facilities and whether the sponsoring contractor has access to project water from the delta as an alternate to those facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11976.

This article is the only portion of this chapter applicable to the State Water Resources Development System.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Administration [11980. - 11985.]

11980.

The department shall establish criteria for determining the eligibility of water conservation projects for assistance under this chapter and shall establish criteria for determination of the economic, financial, and engineering feasibility of proposed water conservation projects. The department shall establish guidelines to encourage feasibility studies to determine potential sources of conserved water for purposes of this chapter and to determine parties interested in contracting with potential water purchasers pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11981.

The State Water Resources Control Board shall establish criteria for determining both of the following:

(a) The eligibility of water reclamation projects for assistance under this chapter.

(b) The economic, financial, and engineering feasibility of proposed reclamation projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11982.

The department shall establish criteria for determining whether a water conservation or reclamation project results in a net increase in the amount of water made available for use and does not interfere with an established right to use of water by any other person or entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11983.

The department and the State Water Resources Control Board shall only approve for funding by the state under this chapter those projects which result in a net increase in the amount of water available for use and which do not interfere with an established right to use of water by any other person or entity. Any agreement between parties for a conservation or reclamation project not using state financing shall not require approval by the department or the State Water Resources Control Board under this chapter but shall comply with the criteria adopted under Section 11981 or 11982.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11984.

The department is authorized to adopt those rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out, and as are consistent with, this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11985.

In providing financial assistance pursuant to this chapter, the department shall impose terms and conditions that are designed to protect the state’s investment and that are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The department shall keep full and complete records and accounts concerning all of its transactions under this chapter and shall render a report on those transactions to the Legislature within 15 days after the commencement of the first regular session of the Legislature following the effective date of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. CO-OPERATION AND CONTRACTS BETWEEN PRIVATE ENTITIES AND THE UNITED STATES [12000. - 12017.]

12000.

As used in this part, “person” means any person, firm, association, organization, partnership, business trust, corporation, or company, but not including any public corporation or other public entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1697.)
-------------------------------------------

12001.

As used in this part, “United States” means the United States of America, and in relation to any particular matter includes the officers, agents, employees, agencies, or instrumentalities authorized to act in relation thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1697.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.

If any provision of this part, or the application thereof to any person or circumstances, is held invalid, the remainder of the part, or the application of said provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1697.)
-------------------------------------------

12003.

Any person may co-operate and contract with the United States, under the Federal Reclamation Act of June 17, 1902, and all acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto or under any other act of Congress heretofore or hereafter enacted permitting co-operation or contracts for any or all of the purposes set forth in Section 12004, whether under said federal reclamation laws, or otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1697.)
-------------------------------------------

12004.

The co-operation or contract may be for any or all of the following purposes:

(a) Construction, acquisition, purchase, extension, operation or maintenance of works and facilities for irrigation, storage, drainage, flood control and generation and distribution of electric energy or either or any of these, or the use or enjoyment of any such works or facilities, or any rights or interests therein.

(b) A water supply.

(c) Assumption or creation, as principal or guarantor or otherwise, of indebtedness to the United States.

(d) To receive or borrow money from the United States and provide for the repayment thereof, for the purpose of constructing projects, distribution systems or other works for the storage, regulation, control, development and distribution of water for the irrigation of land or for any other lawful use, or for the use, control and distribution of drainage water, or for flood control purposes, or for the generation or distribution of electric energy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1697.)
-------------------------------------------

12005.

Any person has all powers, rights, and privileges necessary to enable such person to enter into any contract referred to in this part, and to carry out and perform the terms of any contract so made by such person, and may agree to impose and collect, and may impose and collect, any and all lawful assessments and charges required to carry out and perform any contract so made by such person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1697.)
-------------------------------------------

12006.

Any person, for the purpose of performing the obligations of any contract entered into by such person under the provisions of this part, or for the purpose of obtaining any of the rights, benefits or privileges or assuming and performing any of the obligations or duties created or contemplated by the contracts referred to in this part, and either through the agency of or in co-operation with any other person or public entity or agency, may contract with any other person, or the United States, or the State of California, or any public corporation or agency, in relation thereto, including, but not by way of limitation, the financing thereof, or any other matter of performance thereof, or any other matter incident thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1697.)
-------------------------------------------

12007.

Any person, by an action brought pursuant to the provisions of this part, may submit any contract or proposed contract entered into, or proposed to be entered into, by such person under the provisions of this part to the superior court of either the county in which such person resides or in which such person has its principal office for the transaction of business or in which such contract was made or is to be performed in whole or part, to determine the validity of such contract and each and all of its terms and provisions, and the authority of such person to make and perform the contract, and the authority for and validity of any purchase, acquisition, sale or conveyance under the contract; provided, that if the contract provides for a water supply such decree shall not be construed to be an adjudication that the United States owns, or does not own, such water supply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1697.)
-------------------------------------------

12008.

The validation proceedings shall be an action in rem and shall be brought pursuant to the procedure provided by Sections 861, 862, 865, 866, 867, 868, and 870 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 218.)
-------------------------------------------

12017.

The provisions of this part are cumulative and are not intended to and they shall not be construed as repealing, amending, or otherwise affecting any other provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1697.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4.3. WASHOE PROJECT WATER SUPPLY CONTRACTS [12050. - 12057.]

12050.

The following definitions shall govern the construction of this part:

(a) “Public agency” includes any city, county, district, or other political subdivision of the State of California.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

12051.

The Legislature hereby declares that the purpose of this part is to enable the acquisition of water supplies from the Washoe Project on the Truckee and Carson Rivers or their tributaries for beneficial use in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

12052.

The department may enter into a contract for the acquisition of and payment for a water supply made available to the people of the State of California by the Washoe Reclamation Project—Nevada and California (Act of August 1, 1956, c. 809, Sec. 1, 70 Stat. 775, 43 U.S.C. Sec. 614 (1958), and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto) or by any division or unit thereof; provided, that the authority of the department to so contract shall not be exercised unless the governing body of one or more of the counties or countywide water agencies or countywide districts in the area where the water supply will be used shall first request the department to take such action by duly adopted resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

12053.

(a) As a provision of any contract entered into pursuant to Section 12052, and for the purpose of securing its performance thereunder, the department may assign rights which have accrued or which will accrue to the department from the execution of contracts entered into pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 12054.

(b) Such rights may be effectively assigned notwithstanding the fact that contracts creating such rights have not, at the time of the assignment of rights to accrue thereunder, been executed, the provisions of Section 1045 of the Civil Code or of any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding. The department may require, as a condition precedent to its duty to perform any obligation incurred by virtue of its entry into any contract pursuant to Section 12052, the subsequent execution of all contracts to be entered into by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12054 which are to create the rights assigned.

(c) The department may give such assurances, in the form of covenants in contracts to which it is a party pursuant to the provisions of Section 12052, as may be required by the terms of any interstate compact which effectively allocates water supplies from the Washoe Project or from any division or unit thereof, or by the federal government, including any agency thereof, as operating agency of the Washoe Project or of any division or unit thereof, which assurances are in the judgment of the department necessary and proper to the execution of the intent expressed by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

12054.

Under such regulations and upon such terms, limitations, and conditions as it prescribes, the department may:

(a) Fix and establish the prices, rates, and charges at which the water supply made available to the people of the State of California by the Washoe Project, or by any division or unit thereof, shall be sold and disposed of; and

(b) Enter into contracts and agreements with public agencies or with portions thereof as described in subdivision (e) of Section 12056, for the sale and disposal of water supplies acquired by it pursuant to Section 12052.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

12055.

(a) As a provision of any contract entered into pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12054, and for the purpose of securing its performance thereunder, the department may assign rights which have accrued or which will accrue to the department from the execution of any contract entered into pursuant to the provisions of Section 12052.
